Louisiana, session 2026, HB927.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:153.3 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
46:153.3(D)(2)(a)(xii) is enacted to read as follows:
§153.3. Medical vendor reimbursements; allowable restrictions; peer-based
prescribing and dispensing practice patterns; Medicaid Pharmaceutical and
Therapeutics Committee
* * *
(D)(2)(a) Each nominating organization shall certify by affidavit that the
practice of each nominee involves either the care of or the supervision of the care of
Medicaid recipients. The committee shall be comprised of the following:
* * *
(xii) One physician or pharmacist from each Medicaid managed care
organization.
Section 2. R.S. 46:153.3(C)(1) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1192 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 927
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.